Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 6. Virginia Passenger Rail Authority Act.

§ 33.2-287.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Authority”
means the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority.

“Board”
means the Board of Directors of the Authority.

“Bonds”
means the revenue notes, bonds, certificates, and other evidences of indebtedness or obligations of the Authority.

“Cost”
means, as applied to rail facilities, (i) the cost of construction; (ii) the cost of acquisition of all lands, structures, fixtures, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other property rights and interests; (iii) the cost of demolishing, removing, or relocating any buildings, structures, or fixtures on lands acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which such buildings, structures, or fixtures may be moved or relocated; (iv) the cost of all labor, materials, machinery, and equipment; (v) financing charges and interest on all bonds prior to and during construction and for one year after completion of construction; (vi) the cost of engineering, financial, and legal services, plans, specifications, studies, surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, and other expenses incidental to determining the feasibility of acquiring, constructing, operating, or maintaining rail facilities; (vii) administrative expenses, provisions for working capital, and reserves for interest and for extensions, enlargements, additions, and improvements; and (viii) such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the acquisition, construction, financing, operations, and maintenance of rail facilities. Any obligation or expense incurred by the Commonwealth or any agency thereof for studies, surveys, borings, preparation of plans, and specification or other work or materials in the acquisition or construction of rail facilities may be regarded as a part of the cost of rail facilities and may be reimbursed to the Commonwealth or any agency thereof out of the proceeds of the bonds issued for such rail facilities as herein authorized.

“Department”
means the Department of Rail and Public Transportation.

“Rail facilities”
means the assets consisting of the real, personal, or mixed property, or any interest in that property, whether tangible or intangible, that are determined to be necessary or convenient for the provision of passenger rail service. “Rail facilities” includes all property or interests necessary or convenient for the acquiring, providing, using, equipping, or maintaining of a rail facility or system, including right-of-way, trackwork, train controls, stations, and maintenance facilities.

“Transportation Board”
means the Commonwealth Transportation Board.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1230 and
1275, cl. 12 provides: “That the General Assembly has determined that the development, expansion, and continuation of commuter and intercity passenger rail service and the development of rail infrastructure, rolling stock, and support facilities to support commuter and intercity passenger rail service are important elements of a balanced transportation system in the Commonwealth and are essential to the Commonwealth’s continued economic growth, vitality, and competitiveness in national and world markets; and that, in pursuit of the development, expansion, and continuation of commuter and intercity passenger rail service, the Commonwealth is pursuing various rail and other infrastructure improvements leading into Washington, D.C., from Virginia, including a new bridge structure that crosses the Potomac River between Arlington County and the District of Columbia in the vicinity of the 14th Street Bridge complex and the Metro Fenwick Bridge and which may include, in addition to the river crossing, reasonably related new track approaches to the new bridge, as well as property acquisition and upgrades to the existing tracks on the Virginia and the Washington, D.C., sides of the new bridge; and that new Metrorail related improvements to, and serving, the Rosslyn Metrorail station in Arlington County that would facilitate the movement of passengers and relieve train congestion on the Blue, Orange, and Silver Metrorail lines, and which may include a new platform and station, pedestrian connections to the existing Rosslyn Metrorail station, and a future new extension of Metrorail under the Potomac River (the Rail Improvements); and that the Commonwealth, through either or both of the Virginia Department of Rail and Public Transportation and the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority or such other Commonwealth agency or political subdivision as the General Assembly may authorize, will own the network of Rail Improvements and the various rail facilities, structures, and equipment constructed or acquired in connection therewith (the Rail Network) and may partner with one or more passenger or commuter rail service providers, including but not limited to Amtrak and the owners and operators of Virginia Rail Express, to deliver enhanced and reliable passenger rail service throughout the Rail Network; and that the Commonwealth, through the Virginia Department of Transportation, owns and operates the tolled express lanes comprising part of the Transform 66 Inside the Beltway express lanes project (the Inside the Beltway Express Lanes) and the revenues therefrom are intended to be applied to pay for transportation and other infrastructure improvements in and around the I-66 corridor; and that the General Assembly desires to authorize the incurrence of obligations secured, in part, by a pledge of certain net toll revenues from the Inside the Beltway Express Lanes collected by the Commonwealth and appropriated by the General Assembly, to finance the costs of (i) acquiring, constructing, renovating, expanding, enlarging, improving, installing, and equipping the Rail Improvements and the Rail Network; (ii) acquiring any lands, structures, fixtures, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other property rights and interests related to the Rail Improvements; and (iii) demolishing, removing, or relocating any buildings, structures, or fixtures on lands acquired for the Rail Improvements.”

§ 33.2-288.
Declaration of public purpose; Virginia Passenger Rail Authority.

The General Assembly finds and determines that (i) it is the policy of the Commonwealth to improve, identify, encourage, and promote new approaches to economic development throughout the Commonwealth; (ii) passenger rail travel and services are integral to the economic development and expansion of the Commonwealth’s economy; and (iii) there exists in the Commonwealth a need to increase passenger rail capacity in the Commonwealth and improve passenger rail services.

In order to increase passenger rail capacity, improve passenger rail services, ameliorate current and future traffic congestion on Virginia highways, and promote the industrial and economic development of the Commonwealth, there is hereby created a body corporate and political subdivision of the Commonwealth to be known as the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority. The Authority is hereby constituted as a public instrumentality exercising public and essential governmental functions, and the exercise of powers conferred by this article shall be deemed to be the performance of an essential governmental function and matters of public necessity for which public moneys may be spent and private property acquired.

The purpose of the Authority shall be to promote, sustain, and expand the availability of passenger and commuter rail service in the Commonwealth and to increase ridership of such service by connecting population centers with passenger and commuter rail service and increasing availability of such service.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1230 and
1275, cl. 12 provides: “That the General Assembly has determined that the development, expansion, and continuation of commuter and intercity passenger rail service and the development of rail infrastructure, rolling stock, and support facilities to support commuter and intercity passenger rail service are important elements of a balanced transportation system in the Commonwealth and are essential to the Commonwealth’s continued economic growth, vitality, and competitiveness in national and world markets; and that, in pursuit of the development, expansion, and continuation of commuter and intercity passenger rail service, the Commonwealth is pursuing various rail and other infrastructure improvements leading into Washington, D.C., from Virginia, including a new bridge structure that crosses the Potomac River between Arlington County and the District of Columbia in the vicinity of the 14th Street Bridge complex and the Metro Fenwick Bridge and which may include, in addition to the river crossing, reasonably related new track approaches to the new bridge, as well as property acquisition and upgrades to the existing tracks on the Virginia and the Washington, D.C., sides of the new bridge; and that new Metrorail related improvements to, and serving, the Rosslyn Metrorail station in Arlington County that would facilitate the movement of passengers and relieve train congestion on the Blue, Orange, and Silver Metrorail lines, and which may include a new platform and station, pedestrian connections to the existing Rosslyn Metrorail station, and a future new extension of Metrorail under the Potomac River (the Rail Improvements); and that the Commonwealth, through either or both of the Virginia Department of Rail and Public Transportation and the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority or such other Commonwealth agency or political subdivision as the General Assembly may authorize, will own the network of Rail Improvements and the various rail facilities, structures, and equipment constructed or acquired in connection therewith (the Rail Network) and may partner with one or more passenger or commuter rail service providers, including but not limited to Amtrak and the owners and operators of Virginia Rail Express, to deliver enhanced and reliable passenger rail service throughout the Rail Network; and that the Commonwealth, through the Virginia Department of Transportation, owns and operates the tolled express lanes comprising part of the Transform 66 Inside the Beltway express lanes project (the Inside the Beltway Express Lanes) and the revenues therefrom are intended to be applied to pay for transportation and other infrastructure improvements in and around the I-66 corridor; and that the General Assembly desires to authorize the incurrence of obligations secured, in part, by a pledge of certain net toll revenues from the Inside the Beltway Express Lanes collected by the Commonwealth and appropriated by the General Assembly, to finance the costs of (i) acquiring, constructing, renovating, expanding, enlarging, improving, installing, and equipping the Rail Improvements and the Rail Network; (ii) acquiring any lands, structures, fixtures, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other property rights and interests related to the Rail Improvements; and (iii) demolishing, removing, or relocating any buildings, structures, or fixtures on lands acquired for the Rail Improvements.”

§ 33.2-289.
Board of Directors.

The Authority shall be governed by the Board of Directors of the Authority consisting of 15 members as follows: (i) 12 nonlegislative citizen members, appointed by the Governor, who shall serve with voting privileges; (ii) a designee of the President and Chief Executive Officer of the National Passenger Rail Corporation, who shall serve without voting privileges; (iii) the chief executive officer of a commuter rail service jointly operated by the Northern Virginia Transportation District established pursuant to §

33.2-1904

and the Potomac and Rappahannock Transportation District established pursuant to the Transportation District Act (§

33.2-1900

et seq.), who shall serve ex officio without voting privileges; and (iv) the Director of the Department, who shall serve ex officio and shall have voting privileges only in the event of a tie. Of the 12 nonlegislative citizen members with voting privileges:

Three members shall reside within the boundaries of the Northern Virginia Transportation District established pursuant to §

33.2-1904

. Such members may be selected from a list recommended by the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission, after due consideration of such list by the Governor;

Three members shall reside within the boundaries of the Potomac-Rappahannock Transportation District established pursuant to the Transportation District Act of 1964 (§

33.2-1900

et seq.). Such members may be selected from a list recommended by the Potomac and Rappahannock Transportation Commission, after due consideration of such list by the Governor;

Two members shall reside within the boundaries of the Richmond Metropolitan Transportation Authority established pursuant to Chapter 29 (§

33.2-2900

et seq.);

Two members shall reside within the boundaries of the Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission established pursuant to Chapter 26 (§

33.2-2600

et seq.);

One member shall reside within the boundaries of Planning District 5, 9, 10, or 11; and

One member shall reside within the boundaries of Planning District 3 or 4.

The nonlegislative citizen members appointed by the Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired term and shall be effective until 30 days after the next meeting of the ensuing General Assembly and, if confirmed, thereafter for the remainder of the term. No member shall be eligible to serve more than two consecutive four-year terms. The remainder of any term for which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining that member’s eligibility for reappointment. No member of a governing body of a locality shall be eligible, during the term of office for which he was elected or appointed, to serve as an appointed member of the Board. The Director shall serve terms coincident with his term of office.

The Director of the Department shall serve as chairman of the Board. The Board shall annually elect from among its members a vice-chairman and a secretary. The Board shall also annually elect a treasurer, who need not be a member of the Board, and may also elect other subordinate officers who need not be a member of the Board, as it deems proper. The chairman or, in his absence, the vice-chairman shall preside at all meetings of the Board. In the absence of both the chairman and vice-chairman, the Board shall appoint a chairman pro tempore, who shall preside at such meetings.

Seven members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the Authority’s business, and no vacancy in the membership shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the Authority. All actions of the Board shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present and voting, except that the sale of land or issuance of bonds shall require an affirmative vote of nine members present and voting.

The Board shall meet at least once quarterly. The Board shall determine the times and places of its regular meetings. Special meetings of the Board shall be held when requested by three or more members of the Board. Any such request for a special meeting shall be in writing, and the request shall specify the time and place of the meeting and the matters to be considered at the meeting. A reasonable effort shall be made to provide each member with notice of any special meeting. No matter not specified in the notice shall be considered at such special meeting unless all members of the Board are present.

The members of the Board shall be entitled to reimbursement for their reasonable travel, meal, and lodging expenses incurred in attending the meetings of the Board or while otherwise engaged in the discharge of their duties. Such expenses shall be paid out of the treasury of the Authority upon vouchers signed by the chairman of the Board or by such other person or persons as may be designated by the Board for this purpose.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275; 2022, c. 212.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1230 and
1275, cl. 9 provides: “That the initial terms for members of the Board of the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority shall be staggered as follows: (i) of the members appointed pursuant to subdivision A 1 of
§

33.2-289

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, one shall be for a term of two years, one shall be for a term of three years, and one shall be for a term of four years; (ii) of the members appointed pursuant to subdivision A 2 of
§

33.2-289

, one shall be for a term of one year, one shall be for a term of two years, and one shall be for a term of four years; (iii) of the members appointed pursuant to subdivision A 3 of
§ 33.2-289, one shall be for a term of one year, and one shall be for a term of three years; (iv) of the members appointed pursuant to subdivision A 4 of
§ 33.2-289, one shall be for a term of two years and one shall be for a term of four years; and (v) of the members appointed pursuant to subdivision A 5 of
§ 33.2-289, one shall be for a term of one year and one shall be for a term of three years.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 212 substituted “One member” for “Two members” in subdivision A 5; added subdivision A 6; and made stylistic changes.

§ 33.2-290.
Executive Director; agents and employees.

The Board shall employ an Executive Director of the Authority, who shall not be a member of the Board and who shall serve at the pleasure of the Board, to direct the day-to-day operations and activities of the Authority and carry out the powers and duties conferred upon him as may be delegated to him by the Board. The Executive Director’s compensation from the Commonwealth shall be fixed by the Board in accordance with law. This compensation shall be established at a level that will enable the Authority to attract and retain a capable Executive Director.

The Executive Director shall employ or retain such other agents or employees subordinate to the Executive Director as may be necessary, subject to the Board’s approval.

Employees of the Authority shall be employed on such terms and conditions as established by the Authority and shall be considered employees of the Commonwealth. Employees of the Authority shall be eligible for membership in the Virginia Retirement System or other retirement plans authorized by Article 4 (§

51.1-125

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 51.1 and participation in all health and related insurance and other benefits, including premium coverage and flexible benefits, available to state employees and provided by law. The Board shall develop and adopt personnel rules, policies, and procedures to give its employees grievance rights, ensure that employment decisions shall be based upon merit and fitness of applicants, and prohibit discrimination on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, sex, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions, age, sexual orientation, marital status, or disability. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board shall develop, implement, and administer a paid leave program, which may include annual, personal, and sick leave or any combination thereof. All other leave benefits shall be administered in accordance with Chapter 11 (§

51.1-1100

et seq.) or Chapter 11.1 (§

51.1-1150

et seq.) of Title 51.1, except as otherwise provided in this section.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-291.
Local authorities subordinate to Authority.

Any conflict between any authority granted to localities or other entities of the Commonwealth, other than the Transportation Board and the Department, with respect to the ownership or use of rail facilities or the provision of passenger rail service, or the exercise of that authority, and the exercise of the authority granted by the Board under this article shall be resolved in favor of the exercise of such authority by the Board. Rights-of-way transferred to the Authority from a railroad shall not be subject to the requirements of any local ordinances enacted pursuant to Chapter 22 (§

15.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 15.2.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-292.
Powers of the Authority.

The Authority, in addition to other powers enumerated in this article, is hereby granted and shall have and may exercise all powers necessary or convenient for the carrying out of its statutory purposes, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power to:

Make and adopt bylaws, rules, and regulations;

Adopt, use, and alter at will a common seal;

Maintain offices;

Sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, complain, and defend in all courts in its own name; however, this shall not be deemed a waiver or relinquishment of any sovereign immunity to which the Authority or its officers, directors, employees, or agents are otherwise entitled;

Grant others the privilege to design, build, finance, operate, and maintain rail facilities;

Grant others the privilege to operate concessions, leases, and franchises, including but not limited to the accommodation and comfort of persons using rail facilities and the provision of ground transportation services and parking facilities for such persons;

Borrow money and issue bonds to finance and refinance rail facilities pursuant to §

33.2-294

; and pledge or otherwise encumber all or any of the revenues or receipts of the Authority as security for all or any of the obligations of the Authority, subject to the limitations in subsection J of §

33.2-294

;

Fix, alter, charge, and collect fees, rates, rentals, and other charges for the use of rail facilities, the sale of products, or services rendered by the Authority at rates to be determined by it for the purpose of providing for the payment of (i) expenses of the Authority; (ii) the costs of planning, development, construction, improvement, rehabilitation, repair, furnishing, maintenance, and operation of its rail facilities and properties; (iii) the costs of accomplishing its purposes set forth in §

33.2-288

; and (iv) the principal of and interest on its obligations, and the funding of reserves for such purposes, and the costs of maintaining, repairing, and operating any rail facilities and fulfilling the terms and provisions of any agreement made with the purchasers or holders of any such obligations;

Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties, the furtherance of its purposes, and the execution of its powers under this article, including agreements with any person, federal agency, other state, or political subdivision of the Commonwealth;

Employ, in its discretion, consultants, attorneys, architects, engineers, accountants, financial experts, investment bankers, superintendents, managers, and such other employees and agents as may be necessary and fix their compensation to be payable from funds lawfully available to the Authority;

Appoint advisory committees as may be necessary for the performance of its duties, the furtherance of its purposes, and the execution of its powers under this article;

Vacate or change location of any portion of any public highway, street, public way, public utility, sewer, pipe, main, conduit, cable, wire, tower pole, or other equipment of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions and reconnect the same in a new location;

Enter upon lands, waters, and premises for surveys, soundings, borings, examinations, and other activities as may be necessary for the performance of its duties;

Receive and accept from any federal or private agency, foundation, corporation, association, or person grants, donations of money or real or personal property for the benefit of the Authority and receive and accept from the Commonwealth or any state, and any municipality, county, or other political subdivision thereof and from any other source, aid or contributions of either money, property, or other things of value to be held, used, and applied for the purposes for which such grants and contributions may be made, provided that any federal moneys so received and accepted shall be accepted and expended by the Authority upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the United States and as are consistent with the laws of the Commonwealth and any state moneys so received shall be accepted and expended by the Authority upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the Commonwealth;

Accept loans from the federal government, the state government, regional authorities, localities, and private sources, provided that any federal moneys so accepted shall be accepted and expended by the Authority upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the United States and as are consistent with laws of the Commonwealth and any state moneys so accepted shall be accepted and expended by the Authority upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the Commonwealth;

Lease or sell and convey the airspace superadjacent or subadjacent to any rail facility owned by the Authority;

Pledge or otherwise encumber all or any of the revenues or receipts of the Authority as security for all or any of the obligations of the Authority;

Participate in joint ventures with individuals, domestic or foreign stock and nonstock corporations, limited liability companies, partnerships, limited partnerships, associations, foundations, or other supporting organizations or other entities for providing passenger rail or related services or other activities that the Authority may undertake to the extent that such undertakings assist the Authority in carrying out the purposes and intent of this article;

Act as a “responsible public entity” for the purposes of the acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation, or any combination thereof, of a “qualifying transportation facility” under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§

33.2-1800

et seq.); and

Undertake all actions necessary and convenient to carry out the powers granted herein.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the Authority shall not directly operate any passenger, commuter, or other rail service.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-293.
Acquisition, possession, and disposition of rail facilities; eminent domain.

The Authority shall have the right to acquire by purchase, lease, or grant rail facilities and other lands, structures, property, both real and personal, tangible and intangible, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other interests therein, whether located within or not within the geographic boundaries of the Commonwealth, for the construction, operation, maintenance, and use of rail facilities.

The Authority shall have the right to hold and dispose of rail facilities and other lands, structures, property, both real and personal, tangible and intangible, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other interests therein in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties under this article, including but not limited to the sale, exchange, lease, mortgage, or pledge of such property or interest therein, provided that any such disposition that involves property or interests with a fair market value in excess of $5 million shall require the consent of the Transportation Board.

The Commonwealth and any agencies or political subdivisions thereof may provide services, donate, lease, sell, convey, or otherwise transfer, with or without consideration or for minimal consideration, real or personal property and make appropriations to the Authority for the design, acquisition, construction, equipping, maintenance, and operation of rail facilities and may issue bonds in the manner provided in the Public Finance Act (§

15.2-2600

et seq.) or in its municipal charter for the purpose of providing funds to be appropriated to the Authority; the Authority may agree to assume, or reimburse such a political subdivision for, any indebtedness incurred by such political subdivision with respect to facilities conveyed by it to the Authority.

The Authority is authorized to acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any lands, property rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other property, including public lands, parks, playgrounds, reservations, highways, or parkways, or parts thereof or rights therein, of any person, partnership, association, railroad, public service, public utility, or other corporation, or of any municipality, county, or other political subdivision, deemed necessary for the construction or the efficient operation of rail facilities or necessary in the restoration, replacement, or relocation of public or private property damaged or destroyed whenever a reasonable price cannot be agreed upon with the governing body of such municipality, county, or other political subdivision as to such property owned by it or whenever the Authority cannot agree on the terms of purchase or settlement with the other owners because of the incapacity of such owners, because of the inability to agree on the compensation to be paid or other terms of settlement or purchase, or because such owners are nonresidents of the Commonwealth, are unknown, or are unable to convey valid title to such property. Such proceedings shall be in accordance with and subject to the provisions of any and all laws of the Commonwealth applicable to the exercise of the power of eminent domain and subject to the provisions of Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1. Title to any property condemned by the Authority shall immediately vest in the Authority, and the Authority shall be entitled to the immediate possession of such property upon the deposit with the clerk of the court in which such condemnation proceedings are originated of the total amount of the appraised price of the property and court costs and fees as provided by law, notwithstanding that any of the parties to such proceedings may appeal from any decision in such condemnation proceedings. Whenever the Authority makes such deposit in connection with any condemnation proceedings, the making of such deposit shall not preclude the Authority from appealing any decision rendered in such proceedings. Upon the deposit with the clerk of the court of the appraised price, any person entitled thereto may, upon petition to the court, be paid his or their pro rata share of 100 percent of such appraised price. The acceptance of such payment shall not preclude such person from appealing any decision rendered in such proceedings. If the appraisal is greater or less than the amount finally determined by the decision in such proceedings or by an appeal, the amount of the increase or decrease shall be paid or refunded to the Authority.

The acquisition of any such property by condemnation or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain for the purposes provided herein shall be and is declared to be a public use of such property.

For purposes of this section, the terms “appraised price” and “appraisal” mean the value determined by two competent real estate appraisers appointed by the Authority for such purposes.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.